Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1214
Motor fuel dispensers; label requirements; penalty.

Commencing January 1, 1986, motor fuel dispensers shall be labeled on both faces with the product identity using the most descriptive terms commercially practicable. In addition, all alcohol-blended fuel dispensers shall have a label stating: With or containing ethanol, methanol, or ethanol and methanol or with similar wording if the motor fuel being dispensed contains one percent or more by volume of alcohol. Any person who owns or controls such a motor fuel dispenser and does not attach the notice required by this section shall be guilty of an infraction.

Laws 1985, LB 346, § 6.